Washington statutes.
RCW 39.98.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Bond" means any voted general obligation bond issued by a school district, holding a certificate issued pursuant to this chapter for such a bond.

(2) "Credit enhancement program" means the school district bond guaranty established by this chapter.

(3) "General obligation bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation of a district that constitutes an indebtedness within the meaning of any applicable constitutional or statutory debt limitations.

(4) "Paying agent" means the paying agent selected, from time to time, for a bond issue pursuant to state law.

(5) "Refunding bond" means any general obligation bond issued by a district for the purpose of refunding its outstanding general obligation bonds.

(6) "School district" or "district" means any school district existing now or later under the laws of the state.

[ 1999 c 273 s 2.]